Virginia statutes. Title 3.2. Agriculture, Animal Care, and Food.
Chapter 56. Weights and Measures.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

20 M.J. Weights and Measures, § 1.

§ 3.2-5600.
Definitions generally.

As used in this chapter, unless the context requires a different meaning:

“Commodity in package form”
means any commodity packaged in any manner in advance of sale in units suitable for either wholesale or retail sale, exclusive of an auxiliary shipping container enclosing packages that individually conform to the requirements of this chapter. An individual item or lot of any commodity not in package form as defined in this section, but on which there is marked a selling price based on an established price per unit of weight or of measure, shall be construed to be commodity in package form.

“Cord”
means the amount of wood that is contained in a space of 128 cubic feet when the wood is ranked and well stowed.

“Dockage”
means the weight of impurities deducted by agreement between the seller and the buyer.

“Fractional parts of units of weight or measure”
means like fractional parts of the value of such unit as prescribed or defined in this chapter, and all contracts concerning the sale of commodities and services shall be construed in accordance with this definition.

“Gross weight”
means the total weight of the commodity, including any wrapper, and any other material or thing weighed or packed with such commodity, and including the vehicle or vessel containing the commodity.

“Inspector”
means a state inspector who is employed and authorized to test, certify, and seal weights and measures.

“Livestock auction market”
means any place of business or establishment where, during the regular course of business, cattle, sheep, swine, or other livestock are offered or exposed for sale, or sold, by weight, or by head, at auction, for compensation or profit.

“Net weight”
means the net weight of a commodity, that is, the weight of the commodity exclusive of any wrapper, and any other material or thing weighed or packed with such commodity, and excluding the vehicle or vessel containing the commodity. Net weight is the difference between the gross weight and the tare weight.

“Point-of-sale system”
means an electronic cash register capable of recovering stored information related to the sale price of individual retail items.

“Sealer”
means an inspector of weights and measures of a city, a county, or a joint city-county jurisdiction.

“Sell”
or

“sale”

includes barter and exchange.

“Tare weight”
means the weight of any wrapper, and any other vehicle, vessel, material or thing that is weighed with, but not an actual part of, a commodity sold by weight; thus, tare weight may include, in the case of a packaged commodity, a wrapper, container, packaging material, binding material, preservative, or the like, or in the case of bulk commodity, a vehicle, box, can, jar, or the like.

“Ton”
means a unit of 2,000 pounds avoirdupois weight.

“Weighmaster”
means the person responsible for weighing livestock that will be offered for sale, based on his weight determination.

“Weight”
means the net weight when used in connection with this chapter. Whenever any commodity is sold on the basis of weight, the net weight of the commodity shall be employed, and all contracts concerning commodities shall be so construed.

“Weights and measures”
means all weights and measures of every kind, including instruments and devices for weighing and measuring, and any appliances and accessories associated with any or all such instruments and devices.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 3-708.1, 59-71; 1962, c. 298; 1966, c. 702, § 3.1-919; 1991, c. 605; 1993, c. 604; 2008, c. 860.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2020, c. 1289, as amended by Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 552, Item 102, effective for the biennium ending June 30, 2022, provides: “In lieu of periodic inspections by the Commissioner, Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services, any person whose weights and measures devices, as defined in §

3.2-5600

, et seq., Code of Virginia, which are used for a commercial purpose may select to provide for the inspection and testing of all such weights and measures to determine the accuracy and correct operation of the equipment or device. The owner shall have all such weights and measures devices tested at least annually by a service agency that is registered pursuant to §

3.2-5703

, Code of Virginia. Weights and measures that have been rejected by a service agency shall not be used again commercially until they have been officially reexamined by the rejecting authority or an inspector employed by the Commissioner, and found to be in compliance with Title 3.2, Chapter 56, Code of Virginia. The owner of such weights and measures devices, or third-party agencies on behalf of the owner, shall report to the Commissioner on an annual basis in a manner prescribed by the Commissioner the results of all testing, including (i) the number of inspections completed, (ii) the number of failures in the weights and measures equipment or devices, and (iii) the actions taken to correct any inaccuracies in the equipment or devices.”

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

20 M.J. Weights and Measures, § 1.

§ 3.2-5601.
Powers and duties of Commissioner.

The Commissioner shall have the custody of the state standards of weight and measure and of the other standards and equipment provided for by this chapter, and shall keep accurate records of the same. The Commissioner shall enforce the provisions of this chapter, and shall have and keep a general supervision over the weights and measures offered for sale, sold, or in use in the Commonwealth.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 3-708.6, 59-77, 59-99, 59-100; 1962, c. 298; 1966, c. 702, § 3.1-924; 1993, c. 604; 2008, c. 860.

§ 3.2-5602.
Commissioner to test accuracy of point-of-sale systems.

The Commissioner shall inspect and test point-of-sale systems, as he deems necessary, to determine: (i) the accuracy and correct operation of the equipment; and (ii) if such system utilizes coding means in lieu of manual entry, the accuracy of the data base.

History.

1991, c. 605, § 3.1-924.1; 2008, c. 860.

§ 3.2-5603.
Two systems of weights and measures recognized; definitions and tables of National Institute of Standards and Technology to govern.

Both the system of weights and measures in customary use in the United States and the metric system of weights and measures are recognized, and one or the other, or both, of these systems shall be used for all commercial purposes in the Commonwealth. The definitions of basic units of weight and measure, the tables of weight and measure, and weights and measures equivalents, as published by the National Institute of Standards and Technology, are recognized and shall govern weighing and measuring equipment and transactions in the Commonwealth.

History.

Code 1950, § 3-708.2; 1962, c. 298; 1966, c. 702, § 3.1-920; 1993, c. 604; 2008, c. 860.

§ 3.2-5604.
State standards of weight and measure.

Such weights and measures in conformity with the standards of the United States as have been supplied to the Commonwealth by the federal government or otherwise obtained by the Commonwealth for use as state standards shall, when the same have been certified as being satisfactory for use as such by the National Institute of Standards and Technology, be the state standards of weight and measure. The state standards shall be kept in a safe and suitable place in the office or laboratory designated by the Commissioner, they shall not be removed from the said office or laboratory except for repairs or for certification, and they shall be maintained in such calibration as prescribed by the National Institute of Standards and Technology. The state standards shall be used only in verifying the office standards and for scientific purposes.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 3-708.4, 59-95, 59-98, 59-99; 1962, c. 298; 1966, c. 702, § 3.1-922; 1993, c. 604; 2008, c. 860.

§ 3.2-5605.
Office standards and field standards.

In addition to the state standards provided for in §

3.2-5604

, there shall be supplied by the Commonwealth at least one complete set of copies of the state standards to be kept in the office or laboratory designated by the Commissioner and to be known as “office standards,” and in addition such “field standards” and such equipment as may be found necessary to carry out the provisions of this chapter. The office standards and field standards shall be verified upon their initial receipt and at least once each year thereafter. The office standards shall be verified by direct comparison with the state standards. After verification of the office standards the field standards shall be verified by comparison with the office standards.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 3-708.5, 59-96, 59-97; 1962, c. 298; 1966, c. 702, § 3.1-923; 1993, c. 604; 2008, c. 860.

§ 3.2-5606.
Advice and recommendations of National Institute of Standards and Technology; publications of Institute.

The Commissioner may be guided in the performance of his duties by the advice and recommendations of the National Institute of Standards and Technology. In addition to the provisions of §

3.2-5611

(relating to the Institute’s publication Handbook 133), §

3.2-5620

(relating to the Institute’s publication, Handbook 44), and §

3.2-5622

(relating to the Institute’s publication, Handbook 130), the Board may give official status to any manual of inspection or other publication of that Institute.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 3-708.7, 59-79; 1962, c. 298; 1966, c. 702, § 3.1-925; 1993, c. 604; 2008, c. 860.

§ 3.2-5607.
The Board may adopt regulations.

The Board may adopt regulations for the enforcement of this chapter. These regulations may include: (i) methods of sale of commodities; (ii) standards of net weight, measure, or count, and standards of fill, for any commodity in package form; (iii) standards concerning the sale and exchange of grains and other agriculture products; (iv) rules governing the technical and reporting procedures to be followed; and (v) the report and record forms and marks of approval and rejection to be used by inspectors and by sealers of weights and measures in the discharge of their official duties. The governing body of any city or county employing a sealer may provide for the technical and reporting procedures to be followed, and the report and record forms and marks of approval and rejection to be used by such sealer within such city or county, unless the Board, after a hearing and with notice to the governing body of the city or county involved, finds that such procedures and forms are inadequate to carry out the purposes of this chapter.

Regulations may also include: (i) exemptions from the sealing or marking requirements of §

3.2-5613

for weights and measures of such character or size that such sealing or marking would be inappropriate, impracticable, or damaging to the apparatus in question; and (ii) exemptions from the requirements of §

3.2-5609

for classes of weights and measures found to be of such character that annual retesting is unnecessary to continued accuracy, provided that such exemptions specify, in a schedule, the frequency of required retests for classes of devices so exempted.

Specifications, tolerances, and regulations for weights and measures of the character of those specified in §

3.2-5609

, designed to eliminate from use, without prejudice to apparatus that conforms as closely as practicable to the official standards, those that: (i) are inaccurate; (ii) are, or are likely to be, faulty because their construction is such that their adjustments are insufficiently permanent or their indications will not repeat correctly; or (iii) facilitate the perpetration of fraud.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 3-708.8, 59-82; 1962, c. 298; 1966, c. 702, § 3.1-926; 1993, c. 604; 2008, c. 860.

§ 3.2-5608.
Testing and inspection of standards procured by cities and counties.

The Commissioner shall annually test the standards of weights and measures procured by any city or county for which the appointment of a sealer of weights and measures is provided by this chapter, and shall approve the same when found to be correct.

History.

Code 1950, § 3-708.9; 1962, c. 298; 1966, c. 702, § 3.1-927; 1993, c. 604; 2008, c. 860.

§ 3.2-5609.
Testing and inspection of weights and measures offered for sale or commercially used.

When not otherwise provided by law, the Commissioner shall have the power to inspect and test, to ascertain if they are correct, all weights and measures kept, offered, or exposed for sale. It shall be the duty of the Commissioner to inspect and test on a periodic basis as he deems necessary, to ascertain if they are correct, all weights and measures commercially used: (i) in determining the weight, measurement, or count of commodities or things sold, or offered or exposed for sale, on the basis of weight, measure, or of count; or (ii) in computing the basic charge or payment for services rendered on the basis of weight, measure, or count. With respect to any single-service devices and any uniformly mass-produced devices, a test may be made on representative samples of such devices; and any lot of which such samples are representative shall be held to be correct or incorrect upon the basis of the results of the inspections and tests on such samples. As used in this chapter, “single-service devices” means any devices designed to be used commercially once and then discarded. “Uniformly mass-produced devices” includes any devices made by means of a mold or die, and not susceptible to individual adjustment.

The Commissioner shall submit a report by October 1 of each year to the Chairmen of the Senate Committee on Finance and Appropriations and the Senate Committee on Agriculture, Conservation and Natural Resources, and the Chairmen of the House Committee on Appropriations and House Committee on Agriculture, Chesapeake and Natural Resources on the testing and inspection activities of the Department weights and measures program including the number and frequency of inspections for the weights and measures devices.

History.

Code 1950, § 3-708.10; 1962, c. 298; 1966, c. 702, § 3.1-928; 1993, c. 604; 2005, c. 850; 2008, c. 860.

Editor’s note.

The Virginia Code Commission authorized the substitution of “Senate Committee on Finance and Appropriations” for “Senate Committee on Finance” and “House Committee on Appropriations” for “House Appropriations Committee” in subsection B. March 10, 2021.

§ 3.2-5610.
Investigations by Commissioner.

The Commissioner shall investigate complaints made to him concerning violations of the provisions of this chapter, and shall, upon his own initiative, conduct such investigations as he deems appropriate and advisable to develop information on prevailing procedures in commercial quantity determinations and on possible violations of the provisions of this chapter and to promote the general objective of accuracy in the determination and representation of quantity in commercial transactions.

History.

Code 1950, § 3-708.11; 1962, c. 298; 1966, c. 702, § 3.1-929; 2008, c. 860.

§ 3.2-5611.
Commissioner to weigh or measure packages and commodities; packages and commodities ordered off sale.

The Commissioner shall, on a periodic basis as he deems necessary, weigh or measure and inspect packages or amounts of commodities kept, offered, or exposed for sale, sold, or in the process of delivery, to determine whether the same contain the amounts represented and whether they be kept, offered, or exposed for sale, or sold, in accordance with law; and when such packages or amounts of commodities are found not to contain the amounts represented, or are found to be kept, offered, or exposed for sale in violation of law, the Commissioner may order them off sale and may so mark or tag them as to show them to be illegal. In carrying out the provisions of this section, the Commissioner may employ sampling and testing procedures as adopted by the National Conference on Weights and Measures, and published in National Institute of Standards and Technology Handbook 133, “Checking the Net Contents of Packaged Goods,” and supplements thereto, or in any publication revising, supplementing, or superseding Handbook 133, for the inspection of packaged commodities in the Commonwealth, except insofar as modified or rejected by regulation. The procedures will determine compliance of a given lot of packages on the basis of the result obtained on a composite sample selected from, and representative of, such lot. No person shall: (i) sell, keep, offer, or expose for sale, any package or amount of commodity that has been ordered off sale or marked or tagged as provided in this section unless and until such package or amount of commodity has been brought into full compliance with all requirements of this chapter; or (ii) dispose of any package or amount of commodity that has been ordered off sale or marked or tagged as provided in this section, and that has not been brought into compliance with the requirements of this chapter, in any manner except with the specific approval of the Commissioner.

History.

Code 1950, § 3-708.14; 1962, c. 298; 1966, c. 702, § 3.1-932; 1993, c. 604; 2008, c. 860.

§ 3.2-5612.
Stop-sale, stop-use and stop-removal orders; seizure and impounding of commodities, weights or measures; violation a misdemeanor; judicial review.

Whenever it appears to the Commissioner that there is a violation of any of the provisions of this chapter, he may, in his discretion, issue and enforce a written or printed stop-sale, stop-use, or stop-removal order against any owner or custodian of any commodity, weight, or measure that is being used, sold, offered, or exposed for sale, or involved in any manner in connection with such violation, and he may further, in his discretion, seize and impound any such commodity, weight, or measure until the Commissioner is satisfied that such violation has ceased and that the owner or custodian thereof is in all respects complying with the provisions of this chapter.

Any owner or custodian of any commodity, weight, or measure who sells, or offers for sale, or otherwise disposes of, or attempts to dispose of, any such commodity, weight or measure, while subject to a stop-sale, stop-use, or stop-removal order, or while seized and impounded, is guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor. Any owner or custodian of any such commodity, weight or measure who feels aggrieved by any action of the Commissioner hereunder shall have the right to apply for a judicial review of the action in accordance with the provisions of the Administrative Process Act (§

2.2-4000

et seq.).

History.

Code 1950, § 3-708.15; 1962, c. 298; 1966, c. 702, § 3.1-933; 1986, c. 615; 1993, c. 604; 2008, c. 860.

Cross references.

As to punishment for Class 1 misdemeanors, see §

18.2-11

.

§ 3.2-5613.
Sealing or marking of weights and measures; condemnation of incorrect weights and measures.

The Commissioner shall approve for use and seal or mark such weights and measures as he finds, upon inspection and test, to be in compliance as specified in §

3.2-5620

, and shall reject and mark or tag as “Condemned for Repairs” such weights and measures as he finds, upon inspection or test, not to be in compliance as specified in §

3.2-5620

, but that in his best judgment are susceptible to satisfactory repair. Sealing or marking shall not be required for weights and measures exempted by a Board regulation issued under the authority of §§

3.2-5607

and 3.2-5620. The Commissioner shall condemn, and may seize and may destroy, weights and measures found not to be in compliance that, in his best judgment, are not susceptible to satisfactory repair. Weights and measures that have been “condemned for repairs” may be confiscated and may be destroyed by the Commissioner if not brought into compliance as required by §

3.2-5621

of this chapter, and may be confiscated and destroyed if used or disposed of contrary to the requirements of that section.

History.

Code 1950, § 3-708.16; 1962, c. 298; 1966, c. 702, § 3.1-934; 1993, c. 604; 2008, c. 860.

§ 3.2-5614.
Police powers of Commissioner.

With respect to the enforcement of this chapter and any other acts dealing with weights and measures that he is, or may be, empowered to enforce, the Commissioner is hereby vested with police powers, and is authorized to arrest any violator of the said acts and to seize for use as evidence, without formal warrant, incorrect or unsealed weights and measures or amounts or packages of commodity, found to be used, retained, offered, or exposed for sale, or sold in violation of law. In the performance of his official duties, the Commissioner is authorized to enter and go into or upon, without formal warrant, any structure or premises, and to stop any person whatsoever if necessary to apprehend such person and to require him to proceed, with or without any vehicle of which he may be in charge, to some place that the Commissioner may specify.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 3-708.17, 59-83; 1962, c. 298; 1966, c. 702, § 3.1-935; 2008, c. 860.

§ 3.2-5615.
Appointment, terms and compensation of local sealers of weights and measures; discontinuance of local program.

The governing bodies of the respective counties and cities may appoint a sealer of weights and measures. However, two or more counties may appoint jointly a sealer subject to the approval of the Commissioner. Sealers appointed under this chapter shall hold office for such terms and shall receive such salaries, as the appointing powers may prescribe. Such salaries shall be paid out of the county or city treasury, as the case may be. No county or city employing a sealer or sealers and conducting a weights and measures program shall discontinue the program without first giving the Commissioner 12 months’ written notice of its intent to do so.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 3-708.19, 59-85; 1962, c. 298; 1966, c. 702, § 3.1-937; 1987, c. 46; 2008, c. 860.

§ 3.2-5616.
Fees of sealers.

No fee shall be charged by the sealer of weights and measures, or by the county or city, for inspecting, testing, or sealing of weights or measures, except that the governing body of a city or county employing a sealer may, by ordinance, prescribe a schedule of fees for such services as are rendered by agreement with or at the request of the person or party served. Such fees shall be used only to defray the cost of such services.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 3-708.20, 59-88; 1962, c. 298; 1966, c. 702, § 3.1-938; 2008, c. 860.

§ 3.2-5617.
Powers and duties of sealers and deputies.

The sealer of a city or of a county, and his deputy when acting under his instructions and at his direction, shall have the same powers and shall perform the same duties within the city or the county for which appointed as are granted to and imposed upon the Commissioner by §§

3.2-5609

,

3.2-5610

,

3.2-5611

,

3.2-5612

,

3.2-5613

,

3.2-5614

, and

3.2-5619

.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 3-708.21, 59-90; 1962, c. 298; 1966, c. 702, § 3.1-939; 2008, c. 860.

§ 3.2-5618.
Standards, equipment, and office space for sealers.

The governing body of each city and county for which a sealer has been appointed as provided for by §

3.2-5615

of this chapter shall: (i) procure at the expense of the city or county, as the case may be, such standards of weight and measure and such additional equipment, to be used for the enforcement of the provisions of this chapter in such city or county, as may be prescribed by the Commissioner; (ii) provide a suitable office for the sealer; and (iii) make provisions for the necessary clerical services, supplies, and transportation, and for defraying contingent expenses incident to the official activities of the sealer in carrying out the provisions of this chapter. When the standards of weight and measure required by this section to be provided by a city or county shall have been examined and approved by the Commissioner, they shall be the official standards for such city or county. It shall be the duty of the sealer to make, or to arrange to have made, at least as frequently as once a year, comparison between his field standards and appropriate standards of a higher order belonging to his city or county or to the Commonwealth, in order to maintain such field standards in accurate condition.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 3-708.22, 59-89; 1962, c. 298; 1966, c. 702, § 3.1-940; 2008, c. 860.

§ 3.2-5619.
Commissioner to have concurrent authority with sealers; ordinances in conflict with chapter.

In cities and counties where sealers of weights and measures have been appointed as provided for in this chapter, the Commissioner shall have concurrent authority to enforce the provisions of this chapter. The provisions of this chapter shall be the law throughout the Commonwealth and no city or county shall pass or enforce ordinances in conflict.

History.

Code 1950, § 3-708.23; 1962, c. 298; 1966, c. 702, § 3.1-941; 2008, c. 860.

§ 3.2-5620.
Specifications and tolerances for weighing and measuring devices.

The specifications, tolerances, and regulations for commercial weighing and measuring devices, together with amendments thereto, as recommended by the National Institute of Standards and Technology, and published in the National Institute of Standards and Technology Handbook 44 and supplements thereto, or any publication revising, supplementing, or superseding Handbook 44, shall be the specifications, tolerances, and regulations for commercial weighing and measuring devices of the Commonwealth, except insofar as specifically modified, amended, or rejected by regulation issued by the Board. For purposes of this chapter, weights and measures shall be deemed to be in compliance with this chapter: (i) when they conform to all applicable requirements of Handbook 44 and supplements thereto, or any publication revising, supplementing, or superseding Handbook 44; or (ii) when they conform to any regulation adopted by the Board to modify, amend, or reject Handbook 44, as specified in this section. Other weights and measures shall not be in compliance.

History.

1993, c. 604, § 3.1-941.1; 2008, c. 860.

Cross references.

As to rates and charges for taxicab service, see4 §

46.2-2062

.

§ 3.2-5621.
Rejected weights and measures.

Weights and measures that have been rejected or condemned for repair under the authority of the Commissioner, of an inspector, or of a sealer shall remain subject to the control of the rejecting authority until such time as suitable repair or disposition thereof has been made as required by this section. The owners of such rejected weights and measures shall cause the same to be made in compliance with this chapter within such time as may be authorized by the rejecting authority, or, in lieu of this, may dispose of the same, but only in such a manner as is specifically authorized by the rejecting authority. Weights and measures that have been rejected shall not again be used commercially until they have been officially reexamined by the rejecting authority, and found to be in compliance with this chapter, or until specific written permission for such use is issued by the rejecting authority.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 3-708.24, 59-93; 1962, c. 298; 1966, c. 702, § 3.1-942; 1993, c. 604; 2008, c. 860.

§ 3.2-5622.
How certain commodities to be sold.

Commodities in liquid form shall be sold only by liquid measure or by weight, and, except as otherwise provided in this chapter, commodities not in liquid form shall be sold by weight, by measure of length or area, or by count. Liquid commodities may be sold by weight, and commodities not in liquid form may be sold by count, only if such methods give accurate information as to the quantity of commodity sold. The provisions of this section shall not apply to: (i) commodities when sold for immediate consumption on the premises where sold; (ii) vegetables when sold by the head or bunch; (iii) commodities in containers standardized by law; (iv) commodities in package form when there exists a general consumer usage to express the quantity in some other manner; (v) concrete aggregates, concrete mixtures, and loose solid materials, including earth, soil, gravel and crushed stone, when sold by cubic measure; (vi) unprocessed vegetable and animal fertilizer when sold by cubic measure; or (vii) peanuts in large multiple bag lots being sold by cleaners or shellers to processors for further processing or repacking. The articles in clauses (i) through (vii) may be sold on a gross weight basis if agreed upon in writing by the mutual consent of the buyer and seller.

The Uniform Regulation for the Method of Sale of Commodities as adopted by the National Conference on Weights and Measures and published in National Institute of Standards and Technology Handbook 130, “Uniform Laws and Regulations,” and supplements thereto or revisions thereof, shall apply to the method of sale of commodities in the Commonwealth, except insofar as modified, amended, or rejected by regulation issued by the Board.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 3-708.25, 59-73; 1962, c. 298; 1966, c. 702, § 3.1-943; 1993, c. 604; 2008, c. 860.

§ 3.2-5623.
Information to be shown on packages.

Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, any commodity in package form, introduced or delivered for introduction into, or received in, intrastate commerce, kept for the purpose of sale, or offered or exposed for sale, shall bear on the outside of the package a definite, plain, and conspicuous declaration of: (i) the identity of the commodity in the package unless the same can easily be identified by an actual or prospective buyer through the wrapper or container; (ii) the net quantity of the contents in terms of weight, measure, or count; and (iii) in the case of any package kept, offered, or exposed for sale, or sold any place other than on the premises where packed, the name and place of business of the manufacturer, packer, or distributor. In connection with the declaration required under clause (ii) of this section the qualifying term “when packed,” or words of similar import shall not be used, nor shall any term qualifying a unit of weight, measure, or count including “jumbo,” “giant,” “full” that tends to exaggerate the amount of commodity in a package be used.

The Uniform Regulation for Packaging and Labeling as adopted by the National Conference on Weights and Measures and published in National Institute of Standards and Technology Handbook 130, “Uniform Laws and Regulations,” and supplements thereto or revisions thereof, shall apply to the method of sale of commodities in the Commonwealth, except insofar as modified or rejected by regulation.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 3-708.26, 59-103; 1962, c. 298; 1966, c. 702, § 3.1-944; 1993, c. 604; 2008, c. 860.

§ 3.2-5624.
Certain packages to show price per single unit of weight, measure, or count.

In addition to the declarations required by §

3.2-5623

of this chapter, any commodity in package form, the package being one of a lot containing random weights, measures, or counts of the same commodity and bearing the total selling price of the package, shall bear on the outside of the package a plain and conspicuous declaration of the price per single unit of weight, measure, or count.

History.

Code 1950, § 3-708.27; 1962, c. 298; 1966, c. 702, § 3.1-945; 2008, c. 860.

§ 3.2-5625.
Misleading containers prohibited; contents of container not to fall below standard.

No commodity in package form shall be so wrapped, nor shall it be in a container so made, formed, or filled, as to mislead the purchaser as to the quantity of the contents of the package, and the contents of a container shall not fall below such reasonable standard of fill as may have been prescribed for the commodity in question by the Board.

History.

Code 1950, § 3-708.28; 1962, c. 298; 1966, c. 702, § 3.1-946; 2008, c. 860.

§ 3.2-5626.
Advertisement of commodities in package form.

Whenever a commodity in package form is advertised in any manner and the retail price of the package is stated in the advertisement, there shall be a declaration of the basic quantity of contents of the package as is required by law or regulation to appear on the package. Such declaration shall be close to, and conspicuously associated with, the statement of price on the package.

History.

Code 1950, § 3-708.29; 1962, c. 298; 1966, c. 702, § 3.1-947; 1993, c. 604; 2008, c. 860.

§ 3.2-5627.
Pricing of retail merchandise.

In a point-of-sale system the selling price of a consumer item displayed or offered for sale at retail shall be clearly and conspicuously indicated in Arabic numerals, so as to be readable and understandable by visual inspection, and shall be stamped upon or affixed to the consumer item or posted at or adjacent to the display.The provisions of this section shall not apply to: (i) greeting cards sold individually that have a code price, readable and understandable by visual inspection, on the back of the card; or (ii) merchandise ordered as a gift by a consumer that is sent by mail or other delivery service to a person other than the consumer by the retailer at the request of the consumer.

Any person who knowingly violates the provisions of this section is guilty of a Class 4 misdemeanor.

History.

1991, c. 605, § 3.1-949.1; 1993, c. 604; 2008, c. 860.

Cross references.

As to punishment for Class 4 misdemeanors, see §

18.2-11

.

As to violation of this section being prohibited practices under the Virginia Consumer Protection Act, see § 59.1-200.

§ 3.2-5628.
Weights and Measures Fund established; purpose.

There is hereby established in the state treasury a special nonreverting fund to be known as the Weights and Measures Fund, hereinafter referred to as “the Fund.” This Fund shall be established on the books of the Comptroller. All money designated for inclusion in the Fund or collected pursuant to this chapter shall be paid into the state treasury and credited to the Fund. Interest earned on moneys in the Fund shall remain in the Fund and be credited to it. Any moneys remaining in the Fund, including interest thereon, at the end of each fiscal year shall not revert to the general fund but shall remain in the Fund. The income and principal of this Fund shall be used only for the purposes of administering and enforcing this chapter and Chapter 57 (§

3.2-5700

et seq.) of this title.

History.

1991, c. 605, § 3.1-949.2; 1992, c. 242; 2008, c. 860.

§ 3.2-5629.
Fees and other moneys received.

No fees shall be charged for the services of any appointee under this chapter unless such services are special, unusual or noncommercial and rendered by agreement with or at the request of the person served.

In the event services be rendered by agreement with or at the request of the party served such fees may be charged as the Commissioner may deem proper. All fees and moneys collected or received pursuant hereto shall be paid into the state treasury to be there maintained in the Weights and Measures Fund (§

3.2-5628

) for the administration and carrying out of the provisions of this chapter.

History.

Code 1950, § 3-708.13; 1962, c. 298; 1966, c. 702, § 3.1-931; 2008, c. 860.

§ 3.2-5630.
Violations of pricing requirements.

It shall be a violation of the Virginia Consumer Protection Act (§ 59.1-196 et seq.) for a retail merchant to fail to comply with the provisions of §

3.2-5627

.

History.

1991, c. 605, § 3.1-949.3; 2008, c. 860.

§ 3.2-5631.
Representations as to price; signs advertising price of petroleum products.

Whenever any commodity or service is sold, or is offered, exposed, or advertised for sale, by weight, measure or count, the price shall not be misrepresented, nor shall the price be represented in any manner tending to mislead or deceive an actual or prospective purchaser. Whenever an advertised, posted, or labeled price per unit of weight, measure, or count includes a fraction of a cent, all elements of the fraction shall be prominently displayed and the numerals expressing the fraction shall be immediately adjacent to, of the same general design and style as, and at least one half the height and width of, the numerals representing the whole cents. Whenever the price of petroleum products is advertised or posted at retail, the amount of any taxes may not be shown separately in such advertising or posting unless the words “plus tax” and the numerals expressing the taxes are prominently displayed in letters and numerals of the same general design and style as, and at least one half the height and width of, the numerals representing the price as specified in this section. The total price of the petroleum products so advertised or posted shall not differ from the price as shown on the pump or in any computed price charged the customer.

History.

Code 1950, § 3-708.31; 1962, c. 298; 1966, c. 702, § 3.1-949; 1993, c. 604; 2008, c. 860.

§ 3.2-5632.
Failure to pay advertised cash discount.

Where a discount for the cash purchase of retail petroleum products is offered, willful failure by any person to pay to the customer the full cash discount as offered shall constitute a violation of this chapter.

History.

1991, c. 303, § 3.1-949.01; 2008, c. 860.

§ 3.2-5633.
Commissioner to receive enforcement authority for the Stage II Vapor Recovery Programs.

Upon the request of the Commissioner, the State Air Pollution Control Board may delegate to the Commissioner its authority under Chapter 13 (§ 10.1-1300 et seq.) of Title 10.1, to implement and enforce any provisions of its regulations covering the storage and transfer of petroleum liquids. Upon receiving such delegation, the authority to implement and enforce the regulations under Chapter 13 of Title 10.1 shall be vested solely in the Commissioner, notwithstanding any provision of law contained in Title 10.1, except as provided herein. The State Air Pollution Control Board, in delegating its authority under this section, may make the delegation subject to any conditions it deems appropriate to ensure effective implementation of the regulations according to the policies of the State Air Pollution Control Board.

In addition to the Commissioner’s authority to implement and enforce any provisions of the regulations of the State Air Pollution Control Board covering the storage and transfer of petroleum liquids, the Board may adopt regulations as are reasonably necessary for the administration, monitoring and enforcement of the law relating to the storage and transfer of petroleum liquids. Any violation of the provisions covering the storage and transfer of petroleum liquids shall be deemed to be a violation of this chapter, and the Commissioner may take appropriate enforcement action pursuant to the provisions of this chapter.

History.

1993, c. 604, § 3.1-949.4; 2008, c. 860.